North Dakota statutes. TITLE 7 Building and Loan Associations [Repealed]
CHAPTER 7-06 Liquidation, Suspension, Receivership [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6, effective August 1, 2009]

Note.

Section 6 of ch. 78, S.L. 2007 provides for the repeal of Title 7 effective August 1, 2009.

7-06-01.
Voluntary liquidation and settlement. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-06-02.
Duties of commissioner when association operates unlawfully or is insolvent. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-06-03.
Refusal of association to deliver assets to commissioner. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-06-04.
Commissioner’s duties upon taking over association. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-06-05.
Duty and authority of receiver. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-06-06.
Sale of assets — Compromising liabilities. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-06-07.
Receivership if association is insured under federal law. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]

7-06-08.
Subrogation of federal corporation on payment of insured liabilities. [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 78, § 6]